Utah statutes.
4-31-105.   Outbreak of contagious or infectious disease -- Assistance of federal authorities.

If there is an outbreak of contagious or infectious disease among domestic animals in this state that imperils livestock in adjoining states, the commissioner shall seek the assistance of the United States Department of Agriculture, Animal and Plant Health Inspection Service in preventing the spread of the disease to other states.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 331, 2012 General Session

